sl-SI: Stil igranja prstnih činel: Trebušni ples; Ljudski/tradicionalni; Meditacija/zvočna terapija; Orkestralni; Drugo
bg-BG: Стил на свирене със зил: Ориенталски танци; Фолклорни/Традиционни; Медитация/Звукова терапия; Оркестрови; Други
da: Spillestil for zills: Mavedans; Folkemusik/traditionel; Meditation/lydterapi; Orkester; Andet
en: Zill playing style: Belly dance; Folk/Traditional; Meditation/Sound therapy; Orchestral; Other
pt-PT: Estilo de toque do zill: Dança do ventre; Folclore/tradicional; Meditação/terapia sonora; Orquestral; Outro
fr: Le style de jeu de Zill: Danse du ventre; Folklorique/traditionnel; Méditation/thérapie sonore; Orchestral; Autre
de: Spielweise der Zimbel: Bauchtanz; Folk/Traditionell; Meditation/Klangtherapie; Orchester; Sonstige
tr: Zil çalma stili: Oryantal dans; Halk/Geleneksel; Meditasyon/Ses terapisi; Orkestra; Diğer
lt-LT: Sagatų grojimo stilius: Pilvo šokis; Liaudies / tradicinis; Meditacija / garso terapija; Orkestrinis; Kita
ko: 질 연주 방식: 밸리 댄스; 민속/전통; 명상/사운드 테라피; 오케스트라; 기타
sk-SK: Štýl hry na prstové činely: Brušný tanec; Ľudový/tradičný; Meditácia/zvuková terapia; Orchestrálny; Iné
ja: ジルプレイスタイル: ベリーダンス; フォーク/伝統的; 瞑想/サウンドセラピー; オーケストラ; その他
zh-TW: 手指響鈸演奏方式: 肚皮舞; 民俗/傳統; 冥想/聲音療法; 管弦樂; 其他
pl: Styl gry na zillach: Taniec brzucha; Folkowy/tradycyjny; Medytacja/terapia dźwiękiem; Orkiestrowy; Inne
hu: Zill (ujjcintányér) játékstílusa: Hastánc; Népzenei/Hagyományos; Meditáció/Hangterápia; Zenekari; Egyéb
sv: Spelstil för zill: Magdans; Folkmusik/traditionell; Meditation/ljudterapi; Orkester; Övrigt
ru: Стиль игры на зиллах: Танец живота; Народный/Традиционный; Медитация/Звукотерапия; Оркестровый; Другой
ro-RO: Stil de interpretare pentru zill: Dans din buric; Folk/Tradițional; Meditație/Terapie prin sunet; Orchestral; Altele
cs: Styl hry na prstové činely: Břišní tanec; Folklorní/tradiční; Meditace / terapie zvukem; Orchestrální; Jiné
zh-CN: 指钹演奏风格: 肚皮舞; 民间/传统; 冥想/声音疗法; 管弦乐; 其他
th: สไตล์การเล่นซิลล์: ระบำหน้าท้อง; พื้นบ้าน/ดั้งเดิม; การทำสมาธิ/การบำบัดด้วยเสียง; วงออร์เคสตรา; อื่นๆ
el: Στυλ παιξίματος zill: Χορός της κοιλιάς; Φολκλόρ/Παραδοσιακό; Διαλογισμός/Ηχοθεραπεία; Ορχηστρικό; Άλλο
nl: Zill-speelstijl: Buikdans; Folk/traditioneel; Meditatie/geluidstherapie; Orkestraal; Overig
hr-HR: Stil sviranja zillova: Trbušni ples; Folklorno/tradicionalno; Meditacija / terapija zvukom; Orkestralno; Ostalo
pt-BR: Estilo de tocar zill: Dança do ventre; Folclórico/tradicional; Meditação/terapia sonora; Orquestral; Outros
vi: Phong cách chơi của Zill: Múa bụng; Dân gian/Truyền thống; Thiền định/Trị liệu bằng âm thanh; Giao hưởng; Khác
es: Estilo de ejecución de los crótalos: Danza del vientre; Folclórico/tradicional; Meditación/terapia de sonido; Orquestal; Otro
it: Stile di suonare le zill: Danza del ventre; Folk/tradizionale; Meditazione/terapia del suono; Orchestrale; Altro
nb: Spillestil for zill: Magedans; Folkemusikk/tradisjonell; Meditasjon/lydterapi; Orkestral; Annet
fi: Sormisymbaalin soittotyyppi: Vatsatanssi; Folk/perinteinen; Meditaatio/ääniterapia; Orkesteri; Muu